incubator/apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
     <pardef n="stroj/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="stroj"><i>stroj</i><par n="stroj/__n"/></e>
